Maryland, session 2025, HB0418.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
19–710.1.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Adjunct claims documentation” means an abstract of an enrollee’s
medical record which describes and summarizes the diagnosis and treatment of, and
services rendered to, the enrollee, including, in the case of trauma rendered in a trauma
center, an operative report, a discharge summary, a Maryland Ambulance Information
Systems form, or a medical record.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0418*

HOUSE BILL 418
(3) “Berenson–Eggers Type of Service Code” means a code in a
classification system developed by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services that
groups Current Procedural Terminology codes together based on clinical consistency.
(4) “Enrollee” means a subscriber or member of a health maintenance
organization.
(5) “Evaluation and management service” means any service with a
Berenson–Eggers Type of Service Code in the category of evaluation and management.
(6) “Institute” means the Maryland Institute for Emergency Medical
Services Systems.
(7) “Medicare Economic Index” means the fixed–weight input price index
that:
(i) Measures the weighted average annual price change for various
inputs needed to produce physician services; and
(ii) Is used by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services in the
calculation of reimbursement of physician services under Title XVIII of the federal Social
Security Act.
(8) “Similarly licensed provider” means:
(i) For a physician:
1. A physician who is board certified or eligible in the same
practice specialty; or
2. A group physician practice that contains board certified or
eligible physicians in the same practice specialty;
(ii) For a health care provider that is not a physician, a health care
provider that holds the same type of license.
(9) (i) “Trauma center” means a primary adult resource center, level I
trauma center, level II trauma center, level III trauma center, or pediatric trauma center
that has been designated by the institute to provide care to trauma patients.
(ii) “Trauma center” includes an out–of–state pediatric facility that
has entered into an agreement with the institute to provide care to trauma patients.
(10) “Trauma patient” means a patient that is evaluated or treated in a
trauma center and is entered into the State trauma registry as a trauma patient.

HOUSE BILL 418 3
(11) “Trauma physician” means a licensed physician who has been
credentialed or designated by a trauma center to provide care to a trauma patient at a
trauma center.
(b) In addition to any other provisions of this subtitle, for a covered service
rendered to an enrollee of a health maintenance organization by a health care provider not
under written contract with the health maintenance organization, the health maintenance
organization or its agent:
(1) Shall pay the health care provider within 30 days after the receipt of a
claim in accordance with the applicable provisions of this subtitle; and
(2) Shall pay the claim submitted by:
(i) A hospital at the rate approved by the Health Services Cost
Review Commission;
(ii) A trauma physician for trauma care rendered to a trauma
patient in a trauma center, at the greater of:
1. 140% of the rate paid by the Medicare program, as
published by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, for the same covered service,
to a similarly licensed provider; or
2. The rate as of January 1, 2001 that the health
maintenance organization paid in the same geographic area, as published by the Centers
for Medicare and Medicaid Services, for the same covered service, to a similarly licensed
provider; and
(iii) Any other health care provider:
1. For an evaluation and management service, no less than
the greater of:
A. 125% of the average rate the health maintenance
organization paid as of [January 1 of the previous calendar year] JANUARY 31, 2019, in
the same geographic area, as defined by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services,
for the same covered service, to similarly licensed providers under written contract with
the health maintenance organization, INFLATED BY THE CHANGE IN THE MEDICARE
ECONOMIC INDEX FROM 2019 TO THE CURRENT YEAR; or
B. 140% of the rate paid by Medicare, as published by the
Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, for the same covered service to a similarly
licensed provider in the same geographic area as of August 1, 2008, inflated by the change
in the Medicare Economic Index from 2008 to the current year; and

HOUSE BILL 418
2. For a service that is not an evaluation and management
service, no less than 125% of the average rate the health maintenance organization paid as
of [January 1 of the previous calendar year] JANUARY 31, 2019, in the same geographic
area, as defined by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, to a similarly licensed
provider under written contract with the health maintenance organization for the same
covered service, INFLATED BY THE CHANGE IN THE MEDICARE ECONOMIC INDEX
FROM 2019 TO THE CURRENT YEAR.
(c) For the purposes of subsection (b)(2)(iii) of this section, a health maintenance
organization shall calculate the average rate paid to similarly licensed providers under
written contract with the health maintenance organization for the same covered service by
summing the contracted rate for all occurrences of the Current Procedural Terminology
Code for that service and then dividing by the total number of occurrences of the Current
Procedural Terminology Code.
(d) A health maintenance organization shall disclose, on request of a health care
provider not under written contract with the health maintenance organization, the
reimbursement rate required under subsection (b)(2)(ii) and (iii) of this section.
(e) (1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, a health maintenance
organization may require a trauma physician not under contract with the health
maintenance organization to submit appropriate adjunct claims documentation and to
include on the uniform claim form a provider number assigned to the trauma physician by
the health maintenance organization.
(2) If a health maintenance organization requires a trauma physician to
include a provider number on the uniform claim form in accordance with paragraph (1) of
this subsection, the health maintenance organization shall assign a provider number to a
trauma physician not under contract with the health maintenance organization at the
request of the physician.
(3) A trauma center, on request from a health maintenance organization,
shall verify that a licensed physician is credentialed or otherwise designated by the trauma
center to provide trauma care.
(4) Notwithstanding the provisions of § 19–701(d) of this subtitle, for
trauma care rendered to a trauma patient in a trauma center by a trauma physician, a
health maintenance organization may not require a referral or preauthorization for a
service to be covered.
(f) (1) A health maintenance organization may seek reimbursement from an
enrollee for any payment under subsection (b) of this section for a claim or portion of a claim
submitted by a health care provider and paid by the health maintenance organization that
the health maintenance organization determines is the responsibility of the enrollee.

HOUSE BILL 418 5
(2) The health maintenance organization may request and the health care
provider shall provide adjunct claims documentation to assist in making the determination
under paragraph (1) of this subsection or under subsection (b) of this section.
(g) (1) A health care provider may enforce the provisions of this section by
filing a complaint against a health maintenance organization with the Maryland Insurance
Administration or by filing a civil action in a court of competent jurisdiction under § 1–501
or § 4–201 of the Courts Article.
(2) The Maryland Insurance Administration or a court shall award
reasonable attorney fees if the complaint of the health care provider is sustained.
(h) The Maryland Health Care Commission annually shall review payments to
health care providers to determine the compliance of health maintenance organizations
with the requirements of this section and report its findings to the Maryland Insurance
Administration.
(i) The Maryland Insurance Administration may take any action authorized
under this subtitle or the Insurance Article, including conducting an examination under
Title 2, Subtitle 2 of the Insurance Article, to investigate and enforce a violation of the
provisions of this section.
(j) In addition to any other penalties under this subtitle, the Commissioner may
impose a penalty not to exceed $5,000 on any health maintenance organization which
violates the provisions of this section if the violation is committed with such frequency as
to indicate a general business practice of the health maintenance organization.
(k) The Maryland Insurance Administration, in consultation with the Maryland
Health Care Commission, shall adopt regulations to implement this section.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.